Washington statutes.
RCW 41.37.005

Intent.

It is the intent of the legislature to establish a separate public safety employees' retirement system for certain public employees whose jobs contain a high degree of physical or psychological risk to their own personal safety and who provide public protection of lives and property, but who are not eligible for membership in the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system.

[ 2023 c 199 s 2; 2006 c 309 s 1; 2004 c 242 s 1.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2023 c 199: See notes following RCW 41.37.010.

Effective date—2006 c 309: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [March 29, 2006]." [ 2006 c 309 s 6.]